Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.278

Retirement option.

By July 1, 2000, the department of retirement systems shall adopt rules that allow a member to select an actuarially equivalent retirement option that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death shall be continued throughout the life of a lawful surviving spouse or lawful domestic partner. The continuing allowance to the lawful surviving spouse or lawful domestic partner shall be subject to the yearly increase provided by RCW 43.43.260(5). The allowance to the lawful surviving spouse or lawful domestic partner under this section, and the allowance for an eligible child or children under RCW 43.43.270, shall not be subject to the limit for combined benefits under RCW 43.43.270.

[ 2009 c 522 s 5; 2001 c 329 s 9; 2000 c 186 s 9; 1999 c 74 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 329: See note following RCW 43.43.120.